Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.030

Form may be varied.

Whenever the court or officer before which a person is offered as a witness is satisfied that he or she has a peculiar mode of swearing connected with or in addition to the usual form of administration, which, in witness' opinion, is more solemn or obligatory, the court or officer may, in its discretion, adopt that mode.

[ 2011 c 336 s 133; 2 H. C. s 1695; 1869 p 379 s 3; RRS s 1266.]